Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.170

Use of trademark employed by alien person outside of United States—Limitation of damages, relief—Exceptions.

Damages or equitable relief of any nature may not be awarded in any pending or future legal procedure in favor of an alien person against a domestic person on account of the domestic person's use of a trademark or trade name in this state that is employed by the alien person outside of the United States, absent proof that:

(1) The alien person had commenced to employ the trademark or trade name in connection with the sale of its goods or services within the United States prior to the time the domestic person commenced to use the trademark or trade name in this state; or

(2) That the trademark was registered by the United States patent and trademark office or reserved by the secretary of state to the alien person at the time the domestic person commenced to use it. This section applies regardless of the nature of the claim asserted and whether the claim upon which any such relief is sought arises by statute, under the common law, or otherwise.

[ 1994 c 60 s 7.]